en: Biscuit with a dark chocolate bar covering, Cookie with a dark chocolate bar covering
es: Galletas con tableta de chocolate negro
fr: Biscuits tablette de chocolat noir, Petits beurres au chocolat noir
hr: Biskvit s preljevom od tamne čokolade
it: Biscotti con tavoletta di cioccolato fondente

en: Biscuit with a milk chocolate bar covering, Cookie with a milk chocolate bar covering
es: Galletas con tableta de chocolate con leche
fr: Biscuits tablette de chocolat au lait, Petits beurres au chocolat au lait
hr: Biskvit s preljevom od mliječne čokolade
it: Biscotti con tavoletta di cioccolato al latte

en: Biscuit with a white chocolate bar covering, Cookie with a white chocolate bar covering
fr: Biscuits tablette de chocolat blanc

fr: Biscuits édulcorés, Biscuits avec édulcorants
nl: Biscuits met zoetstoffen

en: Flaky biscuits
de: Blätterteig Gebäck
fi: lohkeilevat keksit
fr: Biscuits feuilletés, biscuit feuilleté
hr: Lisnati keksi
it: Snack dolci a base di sfoglia
nl: Bladerdeegkoekjes, Bladerdeegkoekje

en: Palmiers, Palmier, Puff pastry biscuit
de: Schweinsohren, Schweineohrengebäck, Schweine-Öhrchen, Palmiers
es: Palmeras, palmeritas
fr: Palmiers, Palmiers feuilletés, Biscuit sec feuilleté, Palmier
hr: Dlanovnici
nl: Krakelingen
pt: Palmiers

en: Puff pastry biscuit from bakery, Palmier from bakery
fr: Palmier artisanal

en: Dry biscuits
bg: Сухи бисквити
de: trockene Kekse
es: Galletas secas
fi: kuivat keksit
fr: Biscuits secs, biscuit sec
hr: Suhi keks
hu: Száraz kekszek
it: Biscotti secchi
nl: Droge biscuits

en: Plain biscuit, Plain cookie
bg: Обикновени бисквити
fr: Biscuit sec nature
hr: Obični biskvit

en: Biscuit with vegetal fat, Cookie with vegetal fat
fr: Biscuit sec avec matière grasse végétale

en: Breakfast biscuit, Breakfast cookie
fr: Biscuit sec pour petit déjeuner
hr: Biskvit za doručak
it: Biscotto da colazione

en: Breakfast biscuit with reduced sugar, Breakfast cookie with reduced sugar
fr: Biscuit sec pour petit déjeuner allégé en sucres

en: Breakfast biscuit with chocolate, Breakfast cookie with chocolate
fr: Biscuit sec pour petit déjeuner au chocolat

en: Biscuit with reduced sugar, Cookie with reduced sugar
fr: Biscuit sec pauvre en glucides

en: Breakfast biscuit with cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Breakfast cookie with cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Biscuit aux céréales pour petit déjeuner enrichis en vitamines et minéraux

en: Sponge fingers biscuit, Lady fingers biscuit
bg: Бишкоти
fr: Boudoirs, Boudoir, biscuits à la cuiller, biscuit à la cuiller, biscuits à la cuillère, biscuit à la cuillère, Biscuit sec aux œufs à la cuillère, Biscuit sec aux œufs à la cuiller
hr: Piškote
nl: Lange vingers

en: Florentines, Florentine, Florentines biscuits, Florentine biscuit, Chocolate sweet biscuit with almonds, Chocolate sweet cookie with almonds
de: Florentiner
fr: Florentins, Florentin, Biscuit florentin, Biscuits florentins, Biscuit sec sucré chocolaté aux amandes
hr: Firentinci biskvit
nl: Florentines

en: Shortbread cookies, Shortbread pastry biscuit, Shortbread biscuit with butter
ca: Galetes de mantega
de: Mürbeteigkekse
es: Galletas de mantequilla
fi: Murokeksit
fr: Biscuits sablés, Biscuit sablé, Sablés, Sablé, Sablé pâtissier, Sablés au beurre
hr: Keksi od prhkog tijesta
it: Frollini
ja: ショートブレッド
nl: Zandkoekjes, Zandkokje

en: Shortbread
xx: Shortbread

en: Brittany-style galette biscuits, Shortbread cookies from Brittany
fr: Galettes bretonnes au beurre, galettes bretonnes